public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi '-er inregolari: (re)èser
SFX xM Y 512
SFX xM ser ra/J1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser éra/J1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ser rami/I1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ser ro/J1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX xM ser romi/I1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX xM ser rimo/J2I2 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX xM èser érimo/J2I2 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX xM ser ri/J3 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser éri/J3 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM ser ritu/I3 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM ser retu/I3 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM ser ri/J4 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser éri/J4 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM ser rïu/I4 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM ser ra/J5j5 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser éra/J5j5 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser jèra/J1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser jèrami/I1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser jèro/J1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX xM èser jèromi/I1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX xM èser jèrimo/J2I2 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX xM èser jèri/J3 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser jèritu/I3 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser jèri/J4 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser jèrïu/I4 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser jèra/J5j5 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser ɉèra/J1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser ɉèrami/I1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser ɉèro/J1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX xM èser ɉèromi/I1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX xM èser ɉèrimo/J2I2 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX xM èser ɉèri/J3 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser ɉèritu/I3 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser ɉèri/J4 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser ɉèrïu/I4 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser ɉèra/J5j5 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser xèra/J1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser xèrami/I1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser xèro/J1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX xM èser xèromi/I1 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX xM èser xèrimo/J2I2 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX xM èser xèri/J3 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser xèritu/I3 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser xèri/J4 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser xèrïu/I4 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xM èser xèra/J5j5 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser fuse èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + se
SFX xM èser fúsimo èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo
SFX xM èser fúsemo èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo, coxòto
SFX xM èser fusi/J3 èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + si
SFX xM èser fúsitu/I3 èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + si
SFX xM èser fusi èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si
SFX xM èser fusé èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si, coxòto
SFX xM èser fuse/P0PlP7 èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:third	# T2 + se
SFX xM èser fúselo/I5 èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:third ds:pronomenal+reflexive	# T2 + se
SFX xM èser fúseƚo/i5 èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:third ds:pronomenal+reflexive	# T2 + se
SFX xM èser fose èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + se
SFX xM èser fósimo èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo
SFX xM èser fonsi èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo
SFX xM èser fosi/J3 èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + si
SFX xM èser fósitu/J3 èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + si
SFX xM èser fosi èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si
SFX xM èser fose/P0PlP7 èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:third	# T2 + se
SFX xM èser fóselo/I5 èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:third ds:pronomenal+reflexive	# T2 + se
SFX xM èser fóseƚo/i5 èser	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:third ds:pronomenal+reflexive	# T2 + se
SFX xM èser esesto/A1FS èser	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T2 + st[oiae]
SFX xM èser stasto/A1FS èser	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T2 + st[oiae]
SFX xM èser esendo/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser esèndo/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser sendo/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser ʼsendo/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser sèndo/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser ʼsèndo/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser siando/P0PlP7FS èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser eséndoge/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo
SFX xM èser ʼséndoge/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo
SFX xM èser esèndoge/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo
SFX xM èser ʼsèndoge/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo
SFX xM èser esàndoge/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo
SFX xM èser ʼsàndoge/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo
SFX xM èser siàndoge/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo
SFX xM èser esende/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser esènde/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser sende/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser ʼsende/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser sènde/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser ʼsènde/P0PlP7 èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser siande/P0PlP7FS èser	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser eséndege/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser ʼséndege/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser esèndege/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser ʼsèndege/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser esàndege/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser ʼsàndege/Q0 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo, buranèl
